tests/ger2.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "-ыы": 
    бар<v><iv><ger2><nom> : барыы
    олор<v><iv><ger2><nom> : олоруу
    сыт<v><iv><ger2><nom> :  сытыы
    күл<v><iv><ger2><nom> : күлүү
    билсис<v><iv><ger2><nom> : билсиһии
    харыстан<v><iv><ger2><nom> : харыстаныы
    биллэр<v><tv><ger2><nom> : биллэрии

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><nom> : оҥоруу
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><acc> : оҥорууну
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><par> : оҥоруута
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><dat> : оҥорууга
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><abl> : оҥорууттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><ins> : оҥоруунан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><com> : оҥоруулуун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><comp> : оҥоруутааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><nom> : оҥоруум
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><acc> : оҥоруубун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><par> : оҥоруубуна
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><dat> : оҥоруубар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><abl> : оҥоруубуттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><ins> : оҥоруубунан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><com> : оҥоруубунуун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1sg><comp> : оҥоруубунааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><nom> : оҥорууҥ
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><acc> : оҥоруугун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><par> : оҥоруугуна
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><dat> : оҥоруугар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><abl> : оҥоруугуттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><ins> : оҥоруугунан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><com> : оҥоруугунуун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2sg><comp> : оҥоруугунааҕар
    
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><nom> : оҥоруута
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><acc> : оҥоруутун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><par> : оҥоруутуна
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><dat> : оҥоруутугар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><abl> : оҥоруутуттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><ins> : оҥоруутунан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><com> : оҥоруутунуун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3sg><comp> : оҥоруутунааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><nom> : оҥоруубут
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><acc> : оҥоруубутун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><par> : оҥоруубутуна
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><dat> : оҥоруубутугар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><abl> : оҥоруубутуттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><ins> : оҥоруубутунан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><com> : оҥоруубутунуун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px1pl><comp> : оҥоруубутунааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><nom> : оҥоруугут
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><acc> : оҥоруугутун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><par> : оҥоруугутуна
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><dat> : оҥоруугутугар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><abl> : оҥоруугутуттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><ins> : оҥоруугутунан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><com> : оҥоруугутунуун
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px2pl><comp> : оҥоруугутунааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><nom> : оҥоруулара
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><acc> : оҥорууларын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><par> : оҥорууларына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><dat> : оҥорууларыгар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><abl> : оҥорууларыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><ins> : оҥорууларынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><com> : оҥорууларыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><px3pl><comp> : оҥорууларынааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><nom> : оҥорууларым
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><acc> : оҥорууларбын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><par> : оҥорууларбына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><dat> : оҥорууларбар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><abl> : оҥорууларбыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><ins> : оҥорууларбынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><com> : оҥорууларбыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1sg><comp> : оҥорууларбынааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><nom> : оҥорууларыҥ
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><acc> : оҥорууларгын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><par> : оҥорууларгына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><dat> : оҥорууларгар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><abl> : оҥорууларгыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><ins> : оҥорууларгынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><com> : оҥорууларгыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2sg><comp> : оҥорууларгынааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><nom> : оҥоруулара
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><acc> : оҥорууларын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><par> : оҥорууларына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><dat> : оҥорууларыгар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><abl> : оҥорууларыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><ins> : оҥорууларынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><com> : оҥорууларыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3sg><comp> : оҥорууларынааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><nom> : оҥорууларбыт
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><acc> : оҥорууларбытын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><par> : оҥорууларбытына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><dat> : оҥорууларбытыгар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><abl> : оҥорууларбытыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><ins> : оҥорууларбытынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><com> : оҥорууларбытыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px1pl><comp> : оҥорууларбытынааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><nom> : оҥорууларгыт
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><acc> : оҥорууларгытын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><par> : оҥорууларгытына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><dat> : оҥорууларгытыгар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><abl> : оҥорууларгытыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><ins> : оҥорууларгытынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><com> : оҥорууларгытыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px2pl><comp> : оҥорууларгытынааҕар

    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><nom> : оҥоруулара
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><acc> : оҥорууларын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><par> : оҥорууларына
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><dat> : оҥорууларыгар
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><abl> : оҥорууларыттан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><ins> : оҥорууларынан
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><com> : оҥорууларыныын
    оҥор<v><tv><ger2><pl><px3pl><comp> : оҥорууларынааҕар

  "-һын":
    бараа<v><tv><ger2><nom> : барааһын
    ыйаа<v><tv><ger2><nom> : ыйааһын
    тэрий<v><tv><ger2><nom> : тэрээһин
    хамнаа<v><iv><ger2><nom> : хамнааһын
    былааннаа<v><iv><ger2><nom> : былааннааһын
